Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB711.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Public Transportation Trust Fund Transfer and Increase Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Local transportation organization." As defined in 74 Pa.C.S. § 1503 (relating to definitions)."Secretary." The Secretary of Transportation of the Commonwealth.Section 3. Transfers.Notwithstanding 74 Pa.C.S. § 1506(c)(1) (relating to fund), 1234567891011121314151617 6.15% of the amount collected under Article II of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, shall be deposited into the Public Transportation Trust Fund annually by the 20th day of each month for the preceding month.Section 4. Annual increase.Notwithstanding 74 Pa.C.S. § 1513(c)(3) and (d)(2) (relating to operating program), the total financial assistance provided to each local transportation organization may exceed 20% of the prior year allocation and the secretary may adjust and hold harmless the amount of annual increase in local match under 74 Pa.C.S. § 1513(d)(2) for a period of five fiscal years beginning in fiscal year 2025-2026.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0711PN0775 - 2 - 123456789101112131415